New York, session 2025-2026, S2208.
do enact as follows: 1 Section 1. Section 2.10 of the criminal procedure law is amended by 2 adding a new subdivision 88 to read as follows: 3 88. A tactical medical provider designated by the head of a municipal 4 police department or sheriff; provided, however, that nothing in this 5 subdivision shall be deemed to authorize such officer to carry, possess, 6 repair or dispose of a firearm unless the appropriate license therefor 7 has been issued pursuant to section 400.00 of the penal law. For 8 purposes of this subdivision a tactical medical provider shall mean a 9 licensed physician, paramedic or emergency medical technician. 10 § 2. This act shall take effect immediately. EXPLANATION--Matter in italics (underscored) is new; matter in brackets [ ] is old law to be omitted. LBD04361-01-5